Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Chiropractic Examiners.

Sec. 08.20.010.
Creation and membership of Board of Chiropractic Examiners.

There is created the Board of Chiropractic Examiners consisting of five members appointed by the governor.

History.

(§ 35-3-23 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 1976)

Sec. 08.20.020.
Members of board.

Four members of the board shall be licensed chiropractic physicians who have practiced chiropractic in this state not less than two years. One member of the board shall be a person with no direct financial interest in the health care industry. Each member serves without pay but is entitled to per diem and travel expenses allowed by law.

History.

(§§ 35-3-23, 35-3-30 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 162 SLA 1980)

Sec. 08.20.025.
Removal of board members.

A member of the board may be removed from office by the governor for cause.

History.

(§ 3 ch 162 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For other grounds for removal, see AS

08.01.020

.

Sec. 08.20.030.
Members’ terms; vacancies. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.035.]

Sec. 08.20.040.
Organization of board.

Every two years, the board shall elect from its membership a president, vice president and secretary.

History.

(§ 35-3-24 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 08.20.050.
Power of officers to administer oaths and take testimony.

The president and the secretary may administer oaths in conjunction with the business of the board.

History.

(§ 35-3-24 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 08.20.055.
Board regulations.

The board shall adopt regulations necessary to effect the provisions of this chapter, including regulations establishing standards for

continuing education;

the application, performance, and evaluation of chiropractic core methodology;

the training, qualifications, scope of practice, and employment of chiropractic interns and chiropractic preceptors;

the designation of one or more nationally recognized certification programs for chiropractic clinical assistants; and

the performance of patient examinations authorized under AS

08.20.100(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For the board, see 12 AAC 16, art. 1.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 16, art. 3.

For peer review, see 12 AAC 16, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 15, 2016, in the introductory sentence, deleted “substantive” following “board shall adopt”; added (3) - (5); and made a related stylistic change.

Sec. 08.20.060.
Seal.

The board shall adopt a seal and affix it to all licenses issued.

History.

(§ 35-3-24 ACLA 1949)

Secs. 08.20.070 — 08.20.080.
Secretary; records; reports and accounts of board. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.20.090.
Quorum of board.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

History.

(§ 35-3-24 ACLA 1949)